Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB421.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 158 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) A student of an at-home private school is eligible to participate in an
interscholastic extracurricular activity sponsored by or engaged in by the public
school to which the student would be assigned according to district school board
attendance policies or which the student could choose to attend pursuant to a
district's nonresident pupil policy adopted pursuant to KRS 158.120. A student
eligible under this section who is selected to participate in an interscholastic
extracurricular activity shall:
(a) Pay any participation or activity fee in an amount equal to the fee charged
to public school participants;
(b) Adhere to the same standards of behavior, responsibility, performance, and
code of conduct as any other participants in the extracurricular activity;
(c) Register with the public school his or her intent to participate in
extracurricular activity as a representative of the public school before the
beginning date of the semester for the activity in which he or she wishes to
participate; and
(d) Comply with the same physical examination, immunization, insurance, age,
and semester eligibility requirements as other students participating in the
activity.
(2) A parent, guardian, or teacher of a student of an at-home private school
participating in an interscholastic extracurricular activity at a public school shall
provide the principal of the school an affidavit, on a schedule agreed to by the
parent, guardian, or teacher and principal, to verify that the student is passing his
or her coursework and progressing toward graduation.
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 1/15/2026 3:49 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1849
(3) If a student enrolled in a public school fails to meet the public school's required
academic standards, withdraws from the public school, and enrolls in an at-home
private school, the student shall be ineligible to participate in any interscholastic
extracurricular activity at the public school for the remainder of the school year.
(4) Transportation of a student of an at-home private school to the public school to
participate in an interscholastic extracurricular activity is the responsibility of the
parent, guardian, or student. The student may use the same transportation as
other students if additional expenses are not incurred by the district.
(5) A public school shall not discriminate against a student eligible under this section
in the selection of interscholastic extracurricular team members.
(6) A public school team or group shall not be impeded from competing against any
other public school team or group solely because the public school team or group
includes students eligible under this section.
(7) This section shall not establish authority for a local school district or the
Kentucky Department of Education to regulate an at-home private school
student's education beyond authority established elsewhere in statute.
Section 2. This Act may be cited as the Play Fair Kentucky Act.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 1/15/2026 3:49 PM Jacketed